District of Columbia statutes.
3-1316

Sales agents’ special accounts; reports of receipts and transactions.

(a)

The Board, in its discretion, may require lottery and daily numbers games sales agents to deposit in the Fund or a special escrow account, in the name of the Board, to the credit of the Board, which the Board is authorized to establish, in institutions designated by it which are legal for the deposit of municipal funds, all monies received by such agents from the sale of lottery and daily numbers games tickets less the amount of authorized compensation to licensed agents and prizes, if any, authorized under § 3-1314, and to file with the Board reports of their receipts and transactions in the sale of lottery and daily numbers games tickets in such form and containing such information as the Board may require.

(b)

Lottery and daily numbers games sales agents shall hold in trust, for the benefit of the Board, all monies received by the agent from the sale of lottery and daily numbers games tickets until such monies are transferred to the Board. The Board shall determine the amount of compensation to be paid to the sales agents and the amount of prizes to be paid by sales agents. The Board shall have authority to adopt regulations to implement this section.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-272, § 2(b), 43 DCR 4672

Section References

This section is referenced in § 3-1317.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2516.